Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Federal Block Grants

45.350.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

45.351

to

45.359

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Block grant” means any federal block grant authorized by the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (P.L. 97-35) and any subsequent amendments thereto and any federal block grant authorized by the United States Congress after July 1, 1983.

“Commission” means the Legislative Research Commission.

“Designated review body” means either:

Any interim joint committee, as designated by the Commission at any time when the General Assembly is not in session, whose subject jurisdiction relates to the block grant under review; or

Any interim joint committee, as designated by the Commission at any time when the General Assembly is not in session, whose subject jurisdiction relates to the block grant under review plus the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue; or

Any standing committee, as designated by the Committee on Committees during any legislative session, whose subject jurisdiction relates to the block grant under review; or

Any standing committee, as designated by the Committee on Committees during any legislative session, whose subject jurisdiction relates to the block grant under review plus the Senate and House standing committees on appropriations and revenue.

“Federal administering agency” means any agency of the United States government administering any block grant.

“State administering agency” means any agency of the Commonwealth submitting an application for block grant funding to the secretary or chief public official of the federal administering agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 1, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

45.351.
Applications by state agencies — Requirements.

Every state administering agency shall submit any block grant application for the following fiscal year to the Legislative Research Commission no less than ninety (90) days prior to the date of submission, as required by federal law, of the block grant application to the federal administering agency or no less than ninety (90) days before the state administering agency elects to submit the block grant application to the federal administering agency.

Each state administering agency shall, upon request of the Commission, make available to the Commission all background data and supporting information related to each block grant application under review by the Commission as will enable the Commission to perform its functions in an informed and efficient manner.

Each block grant application submitted by the state administering agency to the Legislative Research Commission shall specify the proposed use and distribution of the block grant and other funds to be allocated by the state administering agency to programs and services; and in addition, each application shall specify:

Programmatic and other requirements applicable to the receipt and expenditures of block grant and other funds, including state matching funds, specified in the application, and the restrictions imposed on the use of these funds;

Whether the block grant and other funds included in the application have been included specifically in an appropriation provision or any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly in anticipation of such application;

Whether the funding is one-time, recurring or continuing;

What costs will accrue to the state if federal funds diminish or are cut, and whether a budget reduction plan has been prepared for such contingency;

Whether the programs and services to be provided under the block grant are mandated by the laws of the Commonwealth;

Whether the programs and services to be provided under the block grant are those which the Commonwealth currently administers and funds;

The agencies expected to provide the services including whether such agencies are public or private or state or local;

The manner in which the allocation of funds will be targeted to need;

Geographic areas to be served by the programs and services;

Standards of eligibility for services;

The criteria and method that will be used by the state administering agency to distribute the block grant funds;

Whether and how block grant funds would be transferred from one (1) block grant to another and the amount of the transfer;

The proportion of the block grant funds to be used for administrative costs; and

Estimated receipt of federal funds applied for by block grant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 2, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 308, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 387, § 16, effective July 15, 1994.

45.3511.
Restrictions on applications — Counties without incorporated area.

State administering agencies shall not have continuation block grant application requests. Each application for a block grant shall be deemed a new application.

No state administering agency shall receive or expend any block grant or other funds included in a block grant application to a federal administering agency, which has not previously been specifically approved as a block grant by the General Assembly in the biennial budget process as having complied with the criteria specified in KRS

45.353

, unless the application is found to be in compliance with the standards and criteria as prescribed in KRS

45.353

, as well as the applicable federal and state laws.

If a county contains no incorporated area, that county shall be permitted to submit two (2) applications per year, one (1) as a county and one (1) as a city, for any block grant program or any category of a block grant program that provides funding on a competitive basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 3, effective July 1, 1982 and July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 308, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXV, § 1, effective April 25, 2006.

45.352.
Hearings by designated review body.

The Legislative Research Commission shall, within ten (10) days of receiving any block grant application from the state administering agency, provide for statewide notice, pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, of public hearings to be conducted by the designated review body for the purpose of receiving comments on the block grant application.

The Commission shall, no later than sixty (60) days prior to the submission of the block grant application to the federal administering agency, provide for a public hearing on each block grant application. The hearing may be held at such time, place and location as the Commission shall determine. All hearings and deliberations of the Commission pursuant to KRS

45.351

to

45.359

shall be electronically recorded. The recordings shall constitute a public record.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 4, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 308, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

45.353.
Referral for review and consideration — Review standards and criteria — Vote required for approval.

The Commission shall refer each block grant application received to the designated review body for review and consideration.

The designated review body shall review and consider each block grant application according to the following standards and criteria, and shall make an affirmative finding of fact that:

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, block grant and other funds specified in the application have been included in an appropriation provision or any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly in anticipation of such application;

Any excess in the total amount of block grant funds sought over the total amount of such funds anticipated and included in an appropriation provision or any branch budget bill, has been included in a surplus expenditure plan approved by the General Assembly;

A budget reduction plan specifying programs and services to be eliminated or to be reduced in scope if federal funding diminishes or is cut, has been included;

The budget reduction plan does not propose to increase the ratio of state funds to federal funds if federal funding diminishes or is cut;

Block grant and other funds to be provided under the application are fairly and equitably distributed among those programs, services, or recipients eligible for block grant funding;

Block grant and other funds to be provided under the application are not to be used to fund programs or services that would duplicate or supplant existing programs or services funded by the private sector;

The intended uses of block grant and other funds specified in the application are in compliance with the applicable federal and state laws pertaining to such block grant funds; and

The amount of block grant and other funds to be retained by the state administering agency for administrative purposes does not exceed an amount allowable under federal law.

For the purpose of the review and consideration of a block grant application, the findings of fact and any other reports or recommendations of the designated review body need only be approved by a majority of the members present at the public hearing held according to KRS

45.352

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 5, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 308, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 387, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

45.3535.
Funding consideration of block grant programs.

Under the economic development funding portion of the Commonwealth’s Community Development Block Grant program, economic development projects recommended for funding by the Cabinet for Economic Development shall be given consideration.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 75, effective July 14, 1992.

45.354.
Report of designated review body — Findings of fact by Legislative Research Commission.

No later than thirty (30) days prior to the state administering agency submission of each block grant application to the federal administering agency, the designated review body shall advise the Commission in writing of its findings of fact on each block grant application as provided under KRS

45.353

.

The Commission shall within ten (10) days review the findings of the designated review body and make written findings of fact to the state administering agency and the Governor regarding each block grant application. The findings of fact shall be based upon the standards and criteria as prescribed in KRS

45.353

.

History.

Enact. Acts. 1982, ch. 455, § 11, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 308, § 6, effective July 13, 1984.

45.355.
Recommendations to legislative research commission by reviewing body. [Repealed.]

45.356.
Revision and resubmission of application — Approval or disapproval. [Repealed.]

45.357.
Block grant program status report.

The Commission or its designated review body shall review the actual use and distribution of all block grant funds made available during the preceding year to any state administering agency.

Any state administering agency receiving block grant funds shall, within thirty (30) days following December 31, 1982, June 30, 1983, and each six (6) months thereafter, submit to the Commission a report for each block grant received to be known as the “Block Grant Program Status Report.”

The Block Grant Program Status Report shall show for the programs and services provided under each block grant for the preceding six (6) months the following:

Appropriations, allotments, expenditures, encumbrances, and available balance.

The level of service budgeted, defined in terms of objectives and beneficiaries.

The level of services delivered during the period.

Alternatives for improved service delivery.

Any changes in service authorized or necessary as a result of unanticipated changes in clientele, resources, or for other reasons.

An evaluation of results, including a description of measurements used.

Staff assigned by the Commission to review block grant applications and other block grant reports and documents submitted by state administering agencies shall be authorized to independently investigate and audit for the Commission all matters pertaining to the application for and expenditure of federal block grant and other funds included in any block grant program administered by any state administering agency.

The Commission or its designated review body shall be authorized to subpoena any reports, or records or documents from any state agency regarding any block grant program administered by a state agency for the purposes of investigating or auditing such program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 8, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 308, § 7, effective July 13, 1984.

45.358.
Legislative oversight fund.

There is hereby created a block grant legislative oversight fund which may be expended by the Commission for the purpose of implementing and administering the provisions of KRS

45.351

to

45.359

and

273.453

.

Each state administering agency shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, withhold and place in the block grant legislative oversight fund one-fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the federal funds made available under the block grant. The funds placed in the block grant legislative oversight fund shall not lapse to the general fund.

The Commission shall determine the actual cost to the Commission of implementing and administering the provisions of KRS

45.351

to

45.359

and

273.453

for each block grant under review. The Commission shall notify each state administering agency in writing of the actual cost determined.

The Commission shall, for the purpose of implementing and administering the provisions of KRS

45.351

to

45.359

and

273.453

for each block grant under review and as permitted by federal law, expend no more than one-fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the federal funds made available under each block grant.

The Commission shall return to the applicable state administering agency any unexpended federal moneys placed in the block grant legislative oversight fund under this section quarterly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 9, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 308, § 8, effective July 13, 1984.

45.359.
Construction of statutes relating to block grants.

If any other section of KRS

45.351

to

45.358

is declared unconstitutional, any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding, no block grant money received from the United States government shall be spent or allocated unless appropriated by the General Assembly in regular or special session.

This section shall supersede all statutes other than KRS

45.351

to

45.358

and any branch budget bills with respect to the expenditure of federal block grant funds and any statute in conflict herewith is repealed to the extent of the conflict.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 455, § 10, effective July 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 387, § 18, effective July 15, 1994.